Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.216

Identification and implementation of potential administrative efficiencies, complementary administrative functions, and complementary academic programs within regional area—Plan—Retention of cost savings—Reports.

(1) The state board for community and technical colleges, in collaboration with the boards of trustees for the community and technical colleges, shall identify potential administrative efficiencies, complementary administrative functions, and complementary academic programs based upon consultation with colleges within a regional area. To study and identify potential administrative efficiencies and complementary administrative functions and programs, colleges within the regional area shall work with stakeholders including faculty and staff representatives appointed by their respective unions. Factors to be considered include, but are not limited to:

(a) The economic feasibility and cost savings anticipated from the proposed changes;

(b) The extent to which the changes will contribute to student access to academic programs and services, including greater flexibility for students to transfer credits and obtain degrees and certificates from other colleges within the regional area; and

(c) The extent to which the changes contribute to the vision, goals, priorities, and statewide strategies in the comprehensive master plan and the statewide strategic master plan for higher education.

(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop and adopt a detailed plan for the implementation of any identified changes that would result in cost savings while maintaining or enhancing student access and achievement. If educational programs are identified that would provide cost savings if consolidated, the faculty and staff of those programs shall be convened to assist in the development of the part of the plan that will impact their programs and collective bargaining agreements. The plan must establish a time frame within which any proposed changes must be accomplished and must include any agreements, approved by the state board for community and technical colleges, between colleges within a regional area to provide complementary academic programs or coordinate administrative functions. The implementation plan shall take effect upon approval by the state board for community and technical colleges. The state board shall submit a preliminary report on the plan to the appropriate legislative committees and the governor December 1, 2010, and shall submit a final report December 1, 2011.

(3) Any cost savings realized as a result of the implementation of administrative efficiencies, complementary administrative functions, and complementary academic programming under the plan shall be retained by the respective districts to be used for enhancing student access and success, and the retention and recruitment of high quality faculty, including but not limited to, full-time faculty, faculty development, and academic programs.

(4) The college board, using the criteria and processes established in this section and in consultation with the boards of trustees for the community and technical colleges, shall identify adjacent college districts that can feasibly be consolidated or whose boundaries can feasibly be modified to form a multiple campus district. The primary considerations shall be the extent to which the changes will: (a) Affect student access to academic programs and services, (b) affect the retention and recruitment of high quality faculty, and (c) result in financial efficiencies.

(5) By December 1, 2012, the college board, in consultation with local boards of trustees, shall evaluate any proposed district consolidations or boundary changes identified in subsection (4) of this section as it deems advisable and shall submit any required supporting legislative changes to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature.

[ 2010 c 246 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2010 c 246: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.